Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.1451] PROHIBITING FLUORIDE ADDITION TO PUBLIC DRINKING WATER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Findings and purpose. new text end new text begin In order to address concerns about health risks associated with the addition of fluoride to public drinking water and to ensure the purity and safety of water sources, the legislature finds that it is necessary to prohibit the addition of fluoride to public water systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Fluoride" means sodium fluoride, hydrofluoric acid, sodium fluorosilicate, and hydrofluorosilicic acid. new text end new text begin (c) "Public water system" means a water system that provides water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances to at least 15 service connections or serves at least 25 people for at least 60 days a year. A public water system may be publicly or privately owned. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) No person may add or cause to be added any form of fluoride to any public water system in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Any municipal water system or other public water system that currently adds fluoride must discontinue those practices no later than August 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health shall enforce the provisions of this section. Any public water system found in violation of this section is subject to a fine of $....... per day of noncompliance. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.145, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-05459 144.145 FLUORIDATION OF MUNICIPAL WATER SUPPLIES. For the purpose of promoting public health through prevention of tooth decay, the person, firm, corporation, or municipality having jurisdiction over a municipal water supply, whether publicly or privately owned or operated, shall control the quantities of fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content prescribed by the state commissioner of health. In the manner provided by law, the state commissioner of health shall promulgate rules relating to the fluoridation of public water supplies which shall include, but not be limited to the following: (1) the means by which fluoride is controlled; (2) the methods of testing the fluoride content; and (3) the records to be kept relating to fluoridation. The state commissioner of health shall enforce the provisions of this section. In so doing the commissioner shall require the fluoridation of water in all municipal water supplies on or before January 1, 1970. The state commissioner of health shall not require the fluoridation of water in any municipal water supply where such water supply in the state of nature contains sufficient fluorides to conform with the rules of such commissioner.